Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-408
Warrant; pursuit and arrest of fugitive.

If any person charged as aforesaid with the commission of an offense shall flee from justice, it shall be lawful for the officer, in whose hands the warrant for such person has been placed, to pursue and arrest such person in any other county of this state, and to convey him before the magistrate issuing the warrant, or any other magistrate having cognizance of the case, of the county where such offense was committed.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 290, p. 790;

R.S.1913, § 8944;

C.S.1922, § 9968;

C.S.1929, § 29-408;

R.S.1943, § 29-408.